Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-419
Fresh pursuit; state, defined.

For purposes of the Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit, the word state shall include the District of Columbia.

Laws 1937, c. 70, § 4, p. 256;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-419;

R.S.1943, § 29-419;

Laws 2001, LB 299, § 2.